North Carolina, session 2025, HB724.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) There is established the NC-Federal Alignment for Critical
Technologies Task Force (Task Force) within the Department of Commerce, Office of Science,
Technology & Innovation (Office). The Task Force shall consist of members of the Office and,
at the discretion of the Office, may consist of members of constituent institutions of The
University of North Carolina and the private sector.
SECTION 1.(b) The Task Force established under subsection (a) of this section shall
have the following duties:
(1) Research ways to increase collaboration among State, federal, and private
entities involved in the promotion of science, technology, and innovation in
the State.
(2) Research ways to streamline State, federal, and private resources to promote
the science and technology industries in the State.
(3) Develop short-, mid-, and long-term economic development-related strategies
and recommendations to increase the patronage and prevalence of the science
and technology industries in the State, with particular emphasis on attracting
out-of-state investment into the State.
(4) Perform any other studies, evaluations, or determinations the Task Force
considers necessary.
SECTION 1.(c) No later than April 1 of each year, the Task Force shall submit a
report with its findings and recommendations to the Joint Legislative Economic Development
and Global Engagement Oversight Committee. These findings and recommendations shall
include specific, concrete, and actionable steps to be undertaken by the State and upon which the
General Assembly could act.
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H724-v-1*